Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Communities of color” means members of racial or ethnic communities as prescribed
by the Oregon Health Authority by rule.
(b) “Community-led” means based on  a set of core principles that, at a minimum, en-
gages the people living in a  geographic community to establish goals and priorities, using
local residents as  leaders, building on strengths rather than focusing on problems and in-
volving cross-sector collaboration that is intentional and adaptable and  works to achieve
systemic change.
(c) “Cross-sector” means involving individuals, public and private institutions and com-
munities working together to address the social determinants of health and equity.
(d) “Culturally specific” means led by individuals from the community served,  using lan-
guage, structures and settings familiar to the members of the community.
(e) “Regional  health equity coalition” means an autonomous, community-led, cross-sector
group that:
(A) Is focused on addressing, at the policy,  system and environmental levels, health in-
equities experienced by priority populations, with  the leading priority being communities of
color;
(B) Is completely independent of coordinated care  organizations and public bodies as de-
fined in ORS 174.109;
(C) Is supported by a federally recognized Indian tribe in  Oregon or one of the following
community-based nonprofit entities:
(i) A culturally specific organization;
(ii) A social service provider;
(iii) An organization that provides health care;
(iv) An organization that conducts public health research;
(v) An organization that provides behavioral health treatment;
(vi) A private foundation; or
(vii) A faith-based organization; and
(D) Has a decision-making body that:
Enrolled Senate Bill 70 (SB 70-B) Page 1
(i) Is composed 51 percent or more of individuals who identify  as members of communi-
ties of color who have experienced health inequities; and
(ii) Prioritizes the recruitment of  members who identify as members of communities of
color or who work in roles that address health inequities and institutional racism.
(f) “Regional health equity coalition model” means an approach that:
(A) Recognizes the impact of structural,  institutional and interpersonal racism on the
health and well-being of communities of color and other priority populations;
(B) Meaningfully engages priority populations to lead efforts to address health inequities;
(C) Supports and strengthens leadership development for priority populations; and
(D) Honors the wisdom of  members of priority populations by ensuring that policy sol-
utions and system changes build upon the strengths of the priority populations.
(g) “Priority populations” means:
(A) Communities of color;
(B) Oregon’s nine federally recognized Indian tribes, including descendants of  the mem-
bers of Oregon’s nine federally recognized Indian tribes;
(C) Immigrants and refugees;
(D) Migrant and seasonal farmworkers;
(E) Low-income individuals and families;
(F) Persons with disabilities; and
(G) Individuals who identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender or queer or who ques-
tion their sexual or gender identity.
(2) The authority shall work with regional health equity coalitions.
(3) The authority shall ensure that it has adequate  staffing to support grantees through
ongoing technical assistance, contract administration, program planning and  daily opera-
tional support.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 70 (SB 70-B) Page 2